Wisconsin, session 2025, AB963.
do enact as follows:AB963,11Section 1. 100.72 of the statutes is created to read:AB963,3,21100.72 Social media accounts for minors. (1) Definitions. In this 2section:AB963,3,73(a) “Account holder” means an individual who is a resident of this state and 4who has an account or profile with a covered social media platform that is 5associated by the covered social media platform with a unique identifier, during any 6period in which the covered social media platform knows or should reasonably know 7the individual is physically located in this state.AB963,3,118(b) “Covered social media platform” means a social media platform and any 9parent, subsidiary, or affiliate of the social media platform that together, in 10aggregate worldwide, generated at least $1,000,000,000 in annual gross revenue in 11at least one of the immediately preceding 3 years.AB963,3,1212(c) “Infinite scrolling” means any of the following:AB963,3,14131. Continuously loading content, or content that loads as the account holder 14scrolls down the page without the need to open a separate page.AB963,3,16152. Seamless content, or the use of pages with no visible or apparent end or 16page breaks.AB963,3,1817(d) “Minor” means a resident of this state who is less than 18 years of age, 18excluding an emancipated minor, as defined in s. 48.375 (2) (e).AB963,3,1919(e) “Parent” includes any legal guardian of a minor.AB963,3,2120(f) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., “personal information” means any of the 21following:AB963,3,2322a. Information about an account holder collected online that comprises 23personal information, as defined in 15 USC 6501 (8).AB963,4,224b. Any record of or derived from online activity or history, search history, or 1online communications of an account holder with respect to any website, 2application, or social media platform.AB963,4,53c. Any photograph or biometric information that is used or could reasonably 4be used to identify the account holder, including fingerprints, voice prints, iris or 5retina images, facial templates, and gait imagery or metrics.AB963,4,76d. Any geolocation information associated with an account holder or with a 7device of an account holder.AB963,4,882. “Personal information” does not include any of the following:AB963,4,109a. An express search term, request, or selection submitted by the account 10holder during the current session on the covered social media platform.AB963,4,1211b. An identifier used solely for the purpose of directing personal 12communications to or from the account holder.AB963,4,1413c. Information that comprises account-holder-selected or parent-selected 14settings relating to privacy, accessibility, or blocking of age-inappropriate content.AB963,4,1515d. Technical information concerning the account holder’s device.AB963,4,1916(g) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., “profile-based feed” means a feed in 17which the material presented has been selected or prioritized by a covered social 18media platform for display to an account holder based in whole or in part on 19personal information of that account holder.AB963,4,20202. “Profile-based feed” does not include any of the following:AB963,5,221a. A feed that includes content created by a 3rd party that is displayed to the 22account holder because the account holder has taken an affirmative step to select 23the 3rd-party’s content for inclusion in the feed, such as by “following,” “friending,” 24or engaging in a similar action in relation to the 3rd party, which content is not 1otherwise selected or prioritized for display to the account holder based on personal 2information.AB963,5,63b. A feed from which is excluded content based on information about or any 4estimate of the age of the account holder if the content is obscene as to minors or if 5the content is, by policy of the covered social media platform, not suitable for 6presentation to minors.AB963,5,117(h) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., “push notification” means an automatic 8electronic message, whether audible, visual, or tactile, designed to call the attention 9of the account holder to newly posted content, or to user responses to content posted 10by the account holder, or to inform the account holder about other specific activities 11or events related to the account holder’s account.AB963,5,14122. “Push notification” does not include a notification alerting the account 13holder of incoming calls, text messages, email messages, or similar messages sent 14by human contacts and delivered by means of any application.AB963,5,1815(i) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., “social media platform” means a website 16or application that is open to the public and that allows a user to create an account 17that enables the user to communicate with other users for the primary purpose of 18posting and viewing information, comments, messages, images, or videos.AB963,5,19192. “Social media platform” does not include any of the following:AB963,5,2020a. A broadband Internet access service, as defined in 47 CFR 8.1 (b).AB963,6,221b. An online service, website, or application the exclusive function of which is 22the support of communications, including emailing or direct messaging of text, 23images, or videos, between only the sender and recipients specifically identified by 1the sender, without displaying or posting the communications publicly or to other 2users not specifically identified as the recipients by the sender.AB963,6,43c. An online service, website, or application the content of which consists 4primarily of information or content that is not user-generated.AB963,6,125(j) “Verifiable parental consent” means any reasonable effort, taking into 6consideration available technology, to ensure that a parent of a minor receives 7notice of the covered social media platform’s personal information collection, use, 8and disclosure practices and authorizes the collection, use, and disclosure, as 9applicable, of personal information and the subsequent use of that information 10before that information is collected from the minor. “Verifiable parental consent” 11includes a request for authorization for future collection, use, and disclosure of a 12minor’s personal information described in a notice to the minor’s parent.AB963,6,1913(2) Age estimation and identification of minors. (a) 1. No later than 14 14days after the date on which an account holder has been on a covered social media 15platform for at least 25 hours within a 6-month period, the covered social media 16platform shall use reasonable means and reasonable efforts, taking into 17consideration available technology and the data in the possession of the covered 18social media platform, to estimate the age of the account holder for purposes of 19subds. 2. and 3.AB963,6,23202. If the covered social media platform, in the estimate under subd. 1., is able 21to conclude with 80 percent confidence that the account holder is at least 18 years of 22age, the covered social media platform may treat the account holder as not a minor 23for purposes of this section.AB963,7,3243. If the covered social media platform, in the estimate under subd. 1., is not 1able to conclude with 80 percent confidence that the account holder is at least 18 2years of age, the covered social media platform shall treat the account holder as a 3minor for purposes of this section.AB963,7,84(b) 1. No later than 14 days after the date on which an account holder has 5been on a covered social media platform for at least 50 hours within a 6-month 6period, the covered social media platform shall use reasonable means and 7reasonable efforts to revise its estimate of the age of the account holder for purposes 8of subds. 2. and 3.AB963,7,1292. If the covered social media platform, in the revised estimate under subd. 1., 10is able to conclude with 90 percent confidence that the account holder is at least 18 11years of age, the covered social media platform may treat the account holder as not 12a minor for purposes of this section.AB963,7,16133. If the covered social media platform, in the revised estimate under subd. 1., 14is not able to conclude with 90 percent confidence that the account holder is at least 1518 years of age, the covered social media platform shall treat the account holder as 16a minor for purposes of this section.AB963,7,2217(c) A covered social media platform shall update its estimate of the age of each 18account holder after every additional 100 hours spent by the account holder on the 19covered social media platform or as often as the covered social media platform 20applies any form of data analytics or artificial intelligence to update its estimate of 21any other demographic characteristic of the account holder, whichever period is 22shorter.AB963,8,423(d) 1. A covered social media platform shall derive the age estimates required 24under this subsection based on information collected and retained by the covered 1social media platform in the ordinary course of operation of the covered social media 2platform. Nothing in this subsection creates a duty on the part of a covered social 3media platform to request, collect, or retain any information from or about an 4account holder.AB963,8,852. A covered social media platform has no obligation under this subsection to 6estimate the age of an account holder who has had an account with the covered 7social media platform continuously for at least 7 years nor to take any action with 8respect to such an account. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab963 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab963 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB963 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB963 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB963: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting